Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-434
Court-martial; error of law; effect.

(1) A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

(2) Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 34, p. 1569.